Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III.] ALIEN AQUATIC ORGANISMS

[§187A-31] Definitions. For the
purposes of this part, "high risk vessel" includes fishing and
recreational vessels and floating structures, such as barges, dry docks,
drilling rigs, and cranes, which have spent extended periods of time tied up in
out-of-state ports. [L 2000, c 134, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next